Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1753.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-4-203, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-4-203. A. Within the next two (2) judicial days


following the child being taken into protective or emergency


custody, the court shall conduct an emergency custody hearing. At


the hearing, information may be provided to the court in the form of


oral or written reports, affidavits or testimony. Any information


having probative value may be received by the court regardless of


its admissibility under the Oklahoma Evidence Code. At the hearing


the court shall:


1. Determine whether facts exist that are sufficient to


demonstrate to the court there is reasonable suspicion that, under a

Req. No. 3399 Page 1


preponderance of the evidence, the child is in need of immediate


protection due to abuse or neglect, or that the circumstances or


surroundings of the child are such that continuation of the child in


the child’s home or in the care or custody of the parent, legal


guardian, or custodian would present an imminent danger to the


child;


2. Advise the parent, legal guardian, or custodian of the child


in writing of the following:


a. any right of the parent, legal guardian, or custodian


to testify and present evidence at court hearings,


b. the right to be represented by an attorney at court


hearings,


c. the consequences of failure to attend any hearings


which may be held, and


d. the right to appeal and procedure for appealing an


order of the court;


3. Determine custody of the child and order one of the


following:


a. release of the child to the custody of the child’s


parent, legal guardian, or custodian from whom the


child was removed under any conditions the court finds


reasonably necessary to protect the health, safety, or


welfare of the child, or



Req. No. 3399 Page 2


b. placement of the child in the custody of a responsible


adult or licensed child-placing agency under any


conditions the court finds reasonably necessary to


protect the health, safety, or welfare of the child,


or


c. whether to continue the child in or to place the child


into the emergency custody of the Department of Human


Services;


4. Order the parent, legal guardian, or custodian to complete


an affidavit listing the names, addresses, and phone numbers of any


parent, whether known or alleged, grandparent, aunt, uncle, brother,


sister, half-sibling, and first cousin and any comments concerning


the appropriateness of the potential placement of the child with the


relative. If no such relative exists, the court shall require the


parent, legal guardian, or custodian to list any other relatives or


persons with whom the child has had a substantial relationship or


who may be a suitable placement for the child;


5. Direct the parent, legal guardian, or custodian to furnish


the Department with a copy of the child’s birth certificate within


fifteen (15) days from the hearing if a petition is filed, unless


otherwise extended by the court; and


6. In accordance with the safety or well-being of any child,


determine whether reasonable efforts have been made to:



Req. No. 3399 Page 3


a. place siblings, who have been removed, together in the


same foster care, guardianship, or adoptive placement,


and


b. provide for frequent visitation or other ongoing


interaction in the case of siblings who have been


removed and who are not placed together.


B. The office of the State Court Administrator Administrative


Director of the Courts shall create an affidavit form and make it


available to each court responsible for conducting emergency custody


hearings. The affidavit form shall contain a notice to the parent,


legal guardian, or custodian that failure to identify a parent or


relative in a timely manner may result in the child being


permanently placed outside of the home of the child’s parent or


relative. The affidavit form shall also advise the parent, legal


guardian, or custodian of the penalties associated with perjury and


contempt of court. The original completed affidavit shall be filed


with the court clerk no later than five (5) days after the hearing


or as otherwise directed by the court and a copy shall be provided


to the Department.


C. 1. The Department shall, within thirty (30) days of the


removal of a child, exercise due diligence to identify relatives.


Notice shall be provided by the Department to the following adult


relatives: all grandparents, all parents of a sibling of the child,


where the parent has legal custody of the sibling, and other adult

Req. No. 3399 Page 4


relatives of the child, including relatives suggested by the


parents, as the court directs. The notice shall advise the


relatives:


a. the child has been or is being removed from the


custody of the parent or parents of the child,


b. of the options under applicable law to participate in


the care and placement of the child, including any


options that may be lost by failing to respond to the


notice, and


c. of the requirements to become a foster family home and


the additional services and supports available for


children placed in the home.


2. Relatives shall not be notified if notification would not be


in the best interests of a child due to past or current family or


domestic violence. The Department may promulgate rules in


furtherance of the provisions of this subsection.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3399 BLB 1/14/2026 2:54:45 PM











Req. No. 3399 Page 5